Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1420
Refunding bonds; issuance; conditions.

A joint authority is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds of the joint authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding, in advance of their maturity or earlier redemption date, which shall have been issued under sections 70-1401 to 70-1423, including the payment of any redemption premium on such bonds and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds. The issuance of such bonds, the maturities, and other details of such bonds, the rights of the holders of such bonds, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the joint authority in respect to the same shall be governed by the appropriate provisions of sections 70-1401 to 70-1423 which relate to the issuance of bonds.

Laws 1982, LB 852, § 20.